Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2649
Conservators; title by appointment.

The appointment of a conservator vests in him title as trustee to all property of the protected person, presently held or thereafter acquired, including title to any property theretofore held for the protected person by custodians or attorneys in fact. The appointment of a conservator is not a transfer or alienation within the meaning of general provisions of any federal or state statute or regulation, insurance policy, pension plan, contract, will or trust instrument, imposing restrictions upon or penalties for transfer or alienation by the protected person of his rights or interest, but this section does not restrict the ability of persons to make specific provisions by contract or dispositive instrument relating to a conservator.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 267, UPC § 5-420.